Hawaii statutes.
§706-605.1 Intermediate sanctions;
eligibility; criteria and conditions. (1) The judiciary shall implement
alternative programs that place, control, supervise, and treat selected
defendants in lieu of a sentence of incarceration.

(2) Defendants may be considered for
sentencing to alternative programs if they have not been convicted of a
non-probationable class A felony.

(3) A defendant may be sentenced by a
district, family, or circuit court judge to alternative programs.

(4) As used in this section, "alternative
programs" means programs that are created and funded by legislative
appropriation or federal grant naming the judiciary or one of its operating
agencies as the expending agency and that are intended to provide an
alternative to incarceration. Alternative programs may include:

(a) House arrest, or curfew using electronic
monitoring and surveillance, or both;

(b) Drug court programs for defendants with assessed
alcohol or drug abuse problems, or both;

(c) Therapeutic residential and nonresidential
programs, including secure drug treatment facilities; and

(d) Similar programs created and designated as
alternative programs by the legislature or the administrative director of the
courts for qualified defendants who do not pose significant risks to the
community. [L Sp 1995, c 25, §4; am L Sp 2009, c 4, §2; am L 2016, c 231, §19]

Cross References

Similar provisions, see §§353-10.5 and 353-63.5.

COMMENTARY ON §706-605.1

Act 25, Special Session Laws 1995, added this section, which
requires the judiciary to implement alternative programs that place, control,
supervise, and treat selected defendants in lieu of an incarceration sentence.
The legislature addressed the problem of prison overcrowding by, inter alia,
providing for the implementation of alternatives to incarceration that do not
undermine public safety. House Standing Committee Report No. 23-S, Senate
Standing Committee Report No. 2-S (1995 Special Session). See also Conference
Committee Report No. 122, Senate Bill No. 82 (vetoed).

Act 4, Special Session Laws 2009, amended this section,
authorizing the placement of certain drug offenders in secure drug treatment
facilities, to promote the rehabilitation of convicted drug offenders through
alternatives to incarceration. The legislature found that providing convicted
drug offenders with drug rehabilitation programs in a secure drug treatment
facility would reduce the offenders' rate of recidivism upon release and help
the offenders develop an important and meaningful role in society. Senate
Standing Committee Report No. 1285, Conference Committee Report No. 25.

Act 231, Session Laws 2016, amended this section to implement
recommendations made by the Penal Code Review Committee convened pursuant to
House Concurrent Resolution No. 155, S.D. 1 (2015).

Law Journals and Reviews

Report on the Success of the Maui/Molokai Adult Drug Court:
Proven Successful, the New Paradigm for our Criminal Justice System? 34 UH L.
Rev. 423 (2012).

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next